Idaho statutes. Title 56 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND WELFARE
Chapter 10 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND WELFARE
§ 56-1030. Regional time sensitive emergency committees — Membership — Duties.

Pursuant to section 56-1028(4), Idaho Code, each substate region designated by the council shall have a time sensitive emergency committee.

Membership of each regional TSE committee shall be based on the needs of the region and can be modified as the regional TSE committee determines, but each regional committee shall be initially comprised as follows:

Each facility that is designated or is seeking designation by the council as a trauma center, stroke facility or heart attack facility may appoint one (1) representative for each of the designations that the facility holds or is seeking to hold to the regional committee for the region in which the facility is located;

Each air medical EMS agency that provides patient transport within the region may appoint one (1) representative;

Each hospital that either holds or is seeking Idaho trauma, stroke or heart attack designation may appoint the hospital administrator;

Each EMS agency with a response area in the region may appoint one (1) representative; and

The regional committee shall include a pediatrician or an expert in children’s trauma.

Members of a regional committee shall elect a chair to serve a term of two (2) years.

The duties of each regional committee shall be as follows:

Implement care guidelines, policies, procedures and protocols for the regional TSE system;

Conduct regional quality improvement, including receipt of reports prepared by the council containing trauma, stroke and heart attack data and making recommendations to facilities within the region based upon those reports;

Advise the council concerning the statewide system;

Establish trauma, stroke and heart attack education and prevention programs;

Provide advice concerning trauma, stroke and heart attack care to health care facilities and other providers of health care;

Perform other duties required by Idaho code and council rules; and

Conduct other activities needed to ensure optimal delivery of trauma, stroke and heart attack care services within the region.

§ 56-1031. Effect on insurance

Patient’s decision. [Repealed.]

§ 56-1032. Preservation of existing rights. [Repealed.]

§ 56-1033. Prior and out-of-state DNR orders and identification

Validity. [Repealed.]

§ 56-1034. Application to mass casualties. [Repealed.]

§ 56-1035. Rulemaking authority. [Repealed.]

§ 56-1036. Legislative intent.

The legislature finds that accidental poisoning is a serious public health problem in the state of Idaho and is a problem that disproportionately affects Idaho’s children. It further finds that a significant reduction in the morbidity and mortality resulting from such accidental poisonings has occurred as a result of the services provided by the poison control center.

The purpose of sections 56-1036 through 56-1040, Idaho Code, is to declare legislative support for the important work of the poison control center and to assure, by statute, the continued existence of the poison control center.

The legislature finds that the poison control center has saved lives and reduced suffering associated with poisoning by providing emergency telephone assistance and treatment referral to victims of such incidents, by providing immediate treatment information to health care professionals, and by providing public education and prevention programs.

The legislature recognizes that enhanced cooperation between the emergency medical system and poison control centers will aid in responding to emergencies resulting from exposure to poisons and that, by providing telephone assistance to individuals with possible exposure to poisons, the need for emergency room and professional office visits will be reduced. As a result, the cost of health care to those who may have been poisoned will be avoided or reduced and appropriate treatment will be assured.

§ 56-1037. Poison control center established — Services offered.

The director of the department of health and welfare (for purposes of sections 56-1036 through 56-1040, Idaho Code, “director”) shall establish, and provide support in a manner consistent with sections 56-1036 through 56-1040, Idaho Code, a statewide poison control center. The poison control center shall offer the following services:

Provide twenty-four (24) hour emergency telephone management and treatment referral of victims of poisoning to include determining whether treatment can be accomplished at the scene of the incident or transport to an emergency treatment or other facility is required, and carrying out telephone follow-up to families and other individuals to assure that adequate care is provided;

Provide information to health professionals involved in management of poisoning and overdose victims; and

Provide coordination and development of community education programs designed to inform the public and members of the health professions of poison prevention and treatment methods and to improve awareness of poisoning problems, occupational risks and environmental exposures.

§ 56-1038. Coordination with other agencies.

The director shall establish a system for consulting with other state agency programs concerned with poisons and poisonings, incidents involving exposures to potentially poisonous substances, and other toxicological matters to develop the most coordinated and consistent response to such situations as is reasonably possible.

§ 56-1039. Power to accept federal funds and gifts.

The director may accept federal funds granted by congress or executive order, as well as gifts, grants, endowments and/or donations from individuals and private organizations or foundations for all or any of the purposes of the poison control center.

§ 56-1040. Rulemaking authority.

The director shall adopt rules necessary to administer sections 56-1036 through 56-1040, Idaho Code, pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

§ 56-1041. State x-ray control agency.

The state department of health and welfare is designated as the state agency having the responsibility for administration of the regulatory, licensing and radiation control provisions associated with x-ray producing machines, as defined in section 56-1042, Idaho Code.

The director of the department of health and welfare shall be administrator of the agency, hereinafter referred to as the director, who shall perform the functions vested in the agency pursuant to the provisions of sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code.

In accordance with the laws of the state, the director may appoint, fix the compensation, and prescribe the powers and duties of such individuals, including consultants, advisory councils, emergency teams and committees as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code. The personnel engaged in field activities of evaluation and inspection shall at least have a baccalaureate degree in the physical and/or life sciences, or the equivalent, and be trained in health physics.

The agency shall for the protection of the occupational and public health and safety:

Develop programs for evaluation of hazards associated with use of radiation;

Formulate and recommend that the board of health and welfare adopt, promulgate and repeal codes, rules and standards relating to control of x-ray producing machines;

Advise, consult, and cooperate with other agencies of the state, and federal government, other states and interstate agencies, political subdivisions, and with groups concerned with control of x-ray producing machines;

Encourage, participate in, or conduct studies, investigations, training, research and demonstrations relating to x-ray producing machines;

Collect and disseminate information relating to control of x-ray producing machines, including:

Maintenance of a file of all license applications, issuances, denials, amendments, transfers, renewals, modifications, suspensions and revocations; and

Maintenance of a file of registrants possessing x-ray producing machines requiring registration under the provisions of sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code, and any administrative or judicial action pertaining thereto;

Have the authority to accept and administer loans, grants, or other funds or gifts, conditional or otherwise, in furtherance of its functions from the federal government and from other sources, public or private;

Issue subpoenas in order to compel the attendance of necessary witnesses and/or the production of records and documents.

§ 56-1042. Definitions.

As used in sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code:

“Board” means the Idaho board of health and welfare.

“Department” means the Idaho department of health and welfare.

“Electronic product” means any manufactured product or device or component part of such a product or device that has an electronic circuit which during operation can generate or emit a physical field of radiation.

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, firm, association, trust, estate, public or private institution, group, agency, political subdivision of this state, any other state or political subdivision or agency thereof, and any legal successor, representative, agent or agency of the foregoing.

“Registration” means registration by any person possessing an x-ray producing machine in accordance with rules and standards adopted by the state board of health and welfare.

“X-ray producing machine” means any type of device which is capable of producing or emitting x-rays.

§ 56-1043. Rules — Licensing requirements and procedure — Registration of x-ray producing machines — Exemptions from registration or licensing.

The board of health and welfare shall provide, by rule, for general or specific licensing of x-ray producing machines. Such rule shall provide for amendment, suspension or revocation of licenses. Such rule shall provide that:

Each application for a specific license shall be in writing and shall state such information as the board, by rule, may determine to be necessary to decide the technical, insurance and financial qualifications, or any other qualification of the applicant as the department may deem reasonable and necessary to protect the occupational and public health and safety. The department may at any time after the filing of the application, and before the expiration of the license, require further written statements and shall make such inspections as the department deems necessary in order to determine whether the license should be granted or denied or whether the license should be modified, suspended or revoked. In no event shall the department grant a specific license to any applicant who has never possessed a specific license issued by a recognized state or federal authority until the department has conducted an inspection or review which insures that the applicant can meet the rules and standards adopted pursuant to sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code. All applications and statements shall be signed by the applicant or licensee. The department may require any applications or statements to be made under oath or affirmation;

Each license shall be in such form and contain such terms and conditions as the board may by rule prescribe;

No license issued under the authority of sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code, and no right to process or utilize x-ray producing machines granted by any license shall be assigned or in any manner disposed of; and

The terms and conditions of all licenses shall be subject to amendment, revision or modification by rules or orders issued in accordance with the provisions of sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code.

The board of health and welfare may require licensing of those persons installing or repairing x-ray producing machines which the board has determined to present a potential hazard to the occupational and public health and safety. Such licensing requirements shall provide that:

Each application for a license shall be in writing and shall state such information as the board, by rule, may determine to be necessary to decide the technical, insurance and financial qualifications, or any other qualification of the applicant as the department may deem reasonable and necessary. The department may at any time after the filing of the application, and before the expiration of the license, require further written statements and shall make such inspections as the department deems necessary in order to determine whether the license should be granted or denied or whether the license should be modified, suspended or revoked. All applications and statements shall be signed by the applicant or licensee. The department may require any applications or statements to be made under oath or affirmation;

Each license shall be in such form and contain such terms and conditions as the board of health and welfare may by rule prescribe;

No license issued under the authority of sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code, and no right to possess or utilize x-ray producing machines granted by any license shall be assigned or in any manner disposed of; and
(d) The terms and conditions of all licenses shall be subject to amendment, revision or modification by rules or orders issued in accordance with the provisions of sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code.

The board of health and welfare may require registration of all x-ray producing machines which the department has determined to present a potential hazard to the occupational and public health and safety.

The board of health and welfare may exempt certain x-ray producing machines or kinds of uses or users from the registration or licensing requirements set forth in this section when the department makes a finding that the exemption of such x-ray producing machines or kinds of uses or users will not constitute a significant risk to the health and safety of the public.

In promulgating rules pursuant to sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code, the board of health and welfare shall, insofar as practical, strive to avoid requiring dual licensing, and shall provide for such recognition of other state or federal licenses as the department shall deem desirable, subject to such registration requirements as the board of health and welfare may prescribe.

§ 56-1044. Radiation machines used to perform mammography.

No person shall use a radiation machine to perform mammography unless the radiation machine is registered with the department of health and welfare under department rules for registration of radiation machines and is specifically authorized under this section for use for mammography.

The department shall authorize a radiation machine for use for mammography if the radiation machine meets the current criteria of the American college of radiology mammography accreditation program, published by the American college of radiology, or meets an equivalent standard adopted by the department. The department shall make copies of those criteria available to the public.

The department may withdraw the mammography authorization for a radiation machine if it does not meet the standards set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

The department shall provide an opportunity for a hearing in connection with a denial or withdrawal of mammography authorization.

Upon a finding that a deficiency in a radiation machine used for mammography or a violation of the rules promulgated under this section seriously affects the health, safety, and welfare of individuals upon whom the radiation machine is used for mammography, the department may issue an emergency order summarily withdrawing the mammography authorization of the radiation machine. The department shall incorporate its findings in the order and shall provide an opportunity for a hearing within five (5) working days after issuance of the order. The order shall be effective during the proceedings.

If the department withdraws the mammography authorization of a radiation machine, the radiation machine shall not be used for mammography until reauthorized by the department.

If a person violates the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the department shall post a conspicuous notice on the unauthorized radiation machine and at the entry to the facility where the radiation machine is located warning the public that the facility is performing mammography using a radiation machine that is a substantial hazard to the public health.

§ 56-1045. Inspection.

The department or its duly authorized representative shall have the power to enter at all reasonable times upon any private or public property for the purpose of determining whether or not there is compliance with or violation of the provisions of sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code, and rules issued thereunder, except that entry into areas under the exclusive jurisdiction of the federal government, or security areas under the direct or indirect jurisdiction of the federal government, shall be effected only with the concurrence of the federal government or its duly designated representative.

§ 56-1046. Records.

The department shall require each person who possesses or uses an x-ray producing machine to maintain necessary records relating to its receipt, use, storage, transfer, or disposal and such other records as the department may require which will permit the determination of the extent of occupational and public exposure from the x-ray producing machine. Copies of these records shall be submitted to the department on request. These requirements are subject to such exemptions as may be provided by rule.

The department may by rule establish standards requiring that personnel monitoring be provided for any employee potentially exposed to x-rays and may provide for the reporting to any employee of his x-ray exposure record.

§ 56-1047. Federal-state agreements — Authorized — Effect as to federal licenses.

The governor, on behalf of this state, is authorized to enter into agreements with the federal government providing for discontinuance of certain of the federal government’s responsibilities with respect to x-ray producing machines and the assumption thereof by this state pursuant to sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code.

Any person who, on the effective date of an agreement under subsection (1) of this section, possesses a license issued by the federal government, shall be deemed to possess the same pursuant to a license issued under sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code, which shall expire either ninety (90) days after the receipt from the department of a notice of expiration of such license or on the date of expiration specified in the federal license, whichever is earlier.

§ 56-1048. Inspection agreements and training programs.

The department is authorized to enter into an agreement or agreements with the federal government, other states, or interstate agencies, whereby this state will perform on a cooperative basis with the federal government, other states, or interstate agencies, inspections or other functions relating to control of x-ray producing machines.

The department may institute training programs for the purpose of qualifying personnel to carry out the provisions of sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code, and may make said personnel available for participation in any program or programs of the federal government, other states, or interstate agencies in furtherance of the purposes of such sections.

§ 56-1049. Administrative procedure.

In any proceeding under sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code, for the issuance or modification or repeal of rules relating to control of x-ray producing machines, the department shall comply with the requirements of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

Notwithstanding any other provision of sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code, whenever the department finds that an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the public health, safety or general welfare, the department may, without notice or hearing, issue a rule or order reciting the existence of such emergency and require that such action be taken as is necessary to meet the emergency. Such rules or orders shall be effective immediately.

§ 56-1050. Injunction proceedings.

Notwithstanding the existence or use of any other remedy, whenever any person has engaged in, or is about to engage in, any acts or practices which constitute or will constitute a violation of any provision of sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code, or any rule or order issued thereunder, the attorney general, upon the request of the department, after notice to such person and opportunity to comply, may make application to the appropriate court for an order enjoining such acts or practices, or for an order directing compliance, and upon a showing by the department that such person has engaged in, or is about to engage in, any such acts or practices, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order may be granted.

§ 56-1051. Prohibited uses.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use, manufacture, produce, transport, transfer, receive, acquire, own or possess any x-ray producing machine unless licensed by or registered with, or exempted by the department in accordance with the provisions of sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use, manufacture, produce, transport, transfer, receive, acquire, own or possess any other x-ray producing machine that has been identified by the department as presenting a potential hazard unless such x-ray producing machine is licensed by or registered by the department in accordance with the provisions of sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code.

§ 56-1052. Impounding of materials.

The department shall have the authority in the event of an emergency to impound or order the impounding of x-ray producing machines in the possession of any person who is not equipped to observe or fails to observe the provisions of sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code, or any rules issued thereunder.

§ 56-1053. Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of sections 56-1041 through 56-1053, Idaho Code, or rules or orders in effect pursuant thereto shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

§ 56-1054. Health quality planning.

It is the intent of the legislature that the department of health and welfare (“the department”) promote improved quality of care and improved health outcomes through investment in health information technology and in patient safety and quality initiatives in the state of Idaho.

Coordinated implementation of health information technology in Idaho will establish widespread use of networked electronic health information or health records to allow quick, reliable and secure access to that information in order to promote patient safety and best practices in health care. This goal is consistent with the mission of the office of the national coordinator for health information technology, established by the president of the United States in 2004, to provide leadership for the development and nationwide implementation of an interoperable health information technology infrastructure to improve the quality and efficiency of health care and the ability of consumers to manage their care and safety.

Coordinated implementation of statewide patient safety standards will identify uniform indicators of and standards for clinical quality and patient safety as well as uniform requirements for reporting provider achievement of those indicators and standards.

There is hereby created and established within the department a health quality planning commission (“the commission”).

By May 1, 2006, and as needed after that date, the governor shall appoint eleven (11) voting members upon assurance of equitable geographic and rural representation, comprising members of the public and private sectors with expertise in health information technology and clinical quality and patient safety. The membership shall represent all major participants in the health care delivery and financing systems. A majority of the commission shall be health care providers or employees of health care providers. One (1) member shall be an Idaho resident representing the public interest. The commission chairperson shall be appointed by the director of the department.

Members of the commission shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years. The term of office shall commence on July 1, 2006. As terms of commission members expire, the governor shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a term of two (2) years in a manner that is consistent with subsection (a) of this section.

The commission shall meet quarterly and at the call of the chairperson.

Each member of the commission shall be compensated as provided by section 59-509(d), Idaho Code.

Upon the occurrence or declaration of a vacancy in the membership of the commission, the department shall notify the represented entity of that fact in writing and the represented entity shall, within sixty (60) days thereafter, nominate at least one (1) and not more than three (3) persons to fill the vacancy and shall forward the nominations to the governor, who shall appoint from among the nominees a person to be a member of the commission to fill the vacancy. Such appointments shall be for a term of two (2) years.

Members of the commission may be removed by the governor for substantial neglect of duty, gross misconduct in office, or the inability to discharge the duties described in this section, after written notice and opportunity for response.
(g) A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business and the carrying out of commission duties.

The department may dedicate funding to the operations of the commission, subject to appropriation from the legislature. The department shall seek federal matching funds and additional private sector funding for commission operations.

The commission shall perform the following duties related to health information technology planning:

Monitor the effectiveness of the Idaho health data exchange; and

Make recommendations to the legislature and the department on opportunities to improve the capabilities of health information technology in the state.

The commission may use the information generated by the Idaho health data exchange and other data sources to promote health and patient safety planning. The commission may perform the following duties related to health quality and patient safety planning, provided that performance of these duties may include contracting with and supervising independent entities for the performance of some or all of these duties:

Analyze existing clinical quality assurance and patient safety standards and reporting;

Identify best practices in clinical quality assurance and patient safety standards and reporting;

Recommend a mechanism or mechanisms for the uniform adoption of certain best practices in clinical quality assurance and patient safety standards and reporting including, but not limited to, the creation of regulatory standards;

Monitor and report appropriate indicators of quality and patient safety;

Recommend a sustainable structure for leadership of ongoing clinical quality and patient safety reporting in Idaho;

Recommend a mechanism or mechanisms to promote public understanding of provider achievement of clinical quality and patient safety standards;

Provide quarterly progress reports to the director of the department. An annual report shall be due to the director and the senate and house of representatives health and welfare committees on June 30 of each year; and

In regard to the commission’s duties provided for in this section, the commission is directed to ensure that such duties are developed and implemented in such a manner and in such forms or formats as to result in health care data that will be readily understood by the citizens of this state.

§ 56-1055. Cytomegalovirus information.

The department shall make available the following information to the public, particularly pregnant women and women who may become pregnant:

Incidence of cytomegalovirus (CMV);

Transmission of CMV;

Birth defects caused by congenital CMV;

Available preventive measures; and

Other information relating to CMV deemed pertinent by the department.

The department shall make available the information described in subsection (1) of this section to:

Health care providers licensed under title 54, Idaho Code, offering care to pregnant women and infants;

Daycare and child care programs and facilities licensed under title 39, Idaho Code, and persons employed by such programs or facilities;

School districts and persons offering health care or health education in a school district;

Religious, ecclesiastical or denominational organizations offering children’s programs as part of their services, and persons employed or volunteering for such programs; and

Other persons and entities that would benefit from such information, as determined by the department.